Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-8,266
Commission; meetings; quorum.

The full commission shall meet at least four times a year. The chairperson or any three members may call additional meetings. A majority of members shall constitute a quorum.

Laws 1972, LB 1081, § 5;

Laws 1974, LB 506, § 1;

Laws 1979, LB 582, § 1;

Laws 1980, LB 923, § 1.